North Carolina, session 2025, SB61.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-89.198 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-89.198. Authority to toll existing interstate highways.
(a) General. – Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and with the exception
set forth in subsection (d) of this section, the Authority may collect tolls on any existing interstate
highway for which the United States Department of Transportation has granted permission by
permit, or any other lawful means, to do so. The revenue generated from the collected tolls shall
be used by the Authority to repair and maintain the interstate on which the tolls were collected.
These revenues shall not be used to repair, maintain, or upgrade any State primary or secondary
road adjacent to or connected with the interstate highways.
(b) Method. – The Authority shall establish toll locations on the permitted interstate
highway in accordance with federal guidelines. Toll locations shall be erected at or near the
borders of the State and at such other locations that are not impracticable, unfeasible, or that
would result in an unsafe or hazardous condition.
(c) Severability. – If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are
severable.
(d) Exception. – This section shall not apply to Interstate 95. The Authority may not
collect tolls on Interstate 95."
SECTION 2. G.S. 136-89.198, as amended by Section 1 of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 136-89.198. Authority to toll existing interstate highways.
(a) General. – Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and with the exception
set forth in subsection (d) of this section, the Authority may collect tolls on any existing interstate
highway for which the United States Department of Transportation has granted permission by
permit, or any other lawful means, to do so. The revenue generated from the collected tolls shall
be used by the Authority to repair and maintain the interstate on which the tolls were collected.
These revenues shall not be used to repair, maintain, or upgrade any State primary or secondary
road adjacent to or connected with the interstate highways.
(b) Method. – The Authority shall establish toll locations on the permitted interstate
highway in accordance with federal guidelines. Toll locations shall be erected at or near the
*S61-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
borders of the State and at such other locations that are not impracticable, unfeasible, or that
would result in an unsafe or hazardous condition.
(c) Severability. – If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are
severable.
(d) Exception. – This section shall not apply to Interstate 95. The Authority may not
collect tolls on Interstate 95.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Authority may not
collect tolls on Interstate 95 without the prior approval of the General Assembly."
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2035. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 61-First Edition